Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 4,391,744
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 13,257,048
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Secretary of State, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 31,918,485
(2) Elections Division ..................... $ 1,354,453
(3) Audits Division.......................... $ 28,788,454
(4) Archives Division ...................... $ 11,646,256
(5) Corporation Division................. $ 15,337,044
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,022,647 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5035 (HB 5035-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5035 (HB 5035-A) Page 2